Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-208
Acquisition of property; prior acts validated.

Any acquisition of property, within or without the limits of any municipality, for airports and other air navigation facilities, or of airport protection privileges, heretofore made by any such municipality in any manner, together with the conveyance and acceptance thereof, is hereby legalized and made valid and effective.

Laws 1945, c. 34, § 4, p. 159.